North Dakota, session 69, HB1392.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 39-04-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
39-04-08. Number plates furnished by the department.
1. The department shall furnish:
a. Two number plates to every motor vehicle owner two number plates for each
registered motor vehicle, and one;
b. One number plate to every motor vehicle owner for each registered motor vehicle
upon request of the registered motor vehicle owner and payment of an additional
fee of one hundred twenty - five dollars; or
c. One number plate for each registered motorcycle, trailer, or housetrailer.
2. The department may, in its discretion, furnish only one number plate for each
registered apportioned vehicle licensed under the international registration plan as
authorized in section 39-19-04, truck tractor, or semitrailer.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 39-04-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
39-04-11. Display of number plates and tabs.
1. Unless otherwise provided by law, an individual may not operate a vehicle on a public
highway of this state unless the vehicle has a distinctive number assigned to the
vehicle by the department, and two number plates, bearing the distinctive number
Page No. 1 25.0608.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
conspicuously displayed, horizontally and in an upright position, one on the front and
one on the rear of the vehicle, each securely fastened, except number plates assigned
to a housetrailer must be attached to the rear of the housetrailer.
2. An individual may operate a vehicle on a public road with only one number plate
displayed on the rear of the vehicle if the registered owner pays the additional fee
under subdivision b of section 39 - 04 - 08 .
3. Number plates assigned to a motorcycle or trailer must be attached to the rear of the
motorcycle or trailer and may be displayed vertically.
4. When only one number plate is furnished for an apportioned vehicle registered under
the international registration plan as authorized in section 39-19-04, truck tractor, or
semitrailer, the plate must be attached to the front of the apportioned vehicle or truck
tractor and the rear of the semitrailer. The bottom of each number plate must be at a
height of not less than twelve inches [30.48 centimeters] above the level surface upon
which the vehicle stands. Each plate must be mounted in a visible manner that clearly
displays the distinctive number assigned to the vehicle and the name of the state on
the plate.
5. As far as is reasonably possible, the platesa plate must at all times be kept free and
clear of mud, ice, or snow so as to be clearly visible and all number plates, markers, or
evidence of registration or licensing except for the current year must be removed from
the vehicle. All vehicle licensenumber plates issued by the department are the
property of the department for the period for which the plates are valid. An annual
registration tab or sticker for the current registration year must be displayed on each
number plate, in the area designated by the department for the tab or sticker, in those
years for which tabs or stickers are issued in lieu of number plates.
SECTION 3. A new subdivision to subsection 2 of section 39-06.1-06 of the North Dakota
Century Code is created and enacted as follows:
A violation of section 39 - 04 - 11, a fee of two hundred dollars .
Page No. 2 25.0608.01000